Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1178.
do enact as follows:SB1178,11Section 1. 15.105 (34) of the statutes is created to read:SB1178,2,4215.105 (34) Wisconsin climate corps board. There is created a Wisconsin 3climate corps board that is attached to the department of administration under s. 415.03, consisting of the following:SB1178,2,55(a) The secretary of natural resources or his or her designee.SB1178,3,11(b) The executive secretary of the board of commissioners of public lands.SB1178,3,22(c) The secretary of administration or his or her designee.SB1178,3,33(d) The secretary of workforce development or his or her designee.SB1178,3,54(e) One representative to the assembly, appointed by the speaker of the 5assembly.SB1178,3,76(f) One representative to the assembly, appointed by the minority leader of 7the assembly.SB1178,3,88(g) One senator, appointed by the president of the senate.SB1178,3,99(h) One senator, appointed by the minority leader of the senate.SB1178,3,1210(i) One member of a nongovernmental organization that has expertise in 11conservation matters or climate resilience or that represents employees who work 12in conservation activities or climate resilience, appointed for a 3-year term.SB1178,3,1413(j) One member of a nongovernmental organization that has expertise in 14youth training programs, appointed for a 3-year term.SB1178,3,1515(k) One member appointed by the Great Lakes Inter-Tribal Council, Inc.SB1178,216Section 2. 16.24 of the statutes is created to read:SB1178,3,171716.24 Climate corps. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB1178,3,1818(a) “Board” means the Wisconsin climate corps board.SB1178,3,2019(b) “Local government” has the meaning given for “local governmental unit” in 20s. 16.97 (7).SB1178,3,2221(c) “Manager” means the nonprofit corporation with which the department 22executes a contract to manage the Wisconsin climate corps program under sub. (3).SB1178,4,323(d) “Nonprofit corporation” means a nonstock, nonprofit corporation described 1under section 501 (c) (3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from the 2federal income tax under section 501 (a) of that code and organized under the laws 3of this state.SB1178,4,84(e) “Project” means a planned undertaking of the Wisconsin climate corps for 5a sponsor to carry out a specific goal within a defined period of time that is focused 6on the restoration and rebuilding of natural lands, weatherization and energy 7efficiency projects in homes, or other climate resiliency projects in urban and rural 8areas of this state.SB1178,4,119(f) “Sponsor” means a local government, tribal government, or nonprofit 10corporation or an executive branch agency, as defined in s. 16.70 (4), that proposes 11to undertake a project.SB1178,4,1712(2) Establishment of program. There is established the Wisconsin climate 13corps program. The purpose of the program is to provide workers to assist with the 14restoration and rebuilding of natural lands, the weatherization of homes, energy 15efficiency projects for homes, and other climate resiliency projects in both rural and 16urban areas and to provide employment training, professional development, and 17career pathways for underserved communities in this state.SB1178,4,2318(3) Board duties. The board shall contract with a nonprofit corporation to 19administer and manage the Wisconsin climate corps program. The nonprofit 20corporation shall be operating on a statewide basis on the effective date of this 21subsection .... [LRB inserts date], and have demonstrated experience in grant 22program writing and administration, natural resource restoration and rebuilding, 23and youth training, education, and employment.SB1178,5,21(4) Contract terms. The contract under sub. (3) shall require the manager 2to do all of the following:SB1178,5,33(a) Develop a project application form.SB1178,5,64(b) Review project applications submitted by sponsors, approve projects, and 5negotiate agreements with sponsors to provide work crews to complete eligible 6projects.SB1178,5,77(c) Require projects to be sited on land that is located in this state.SB1178,5,98(d) Require projects to be for one or more of the purposes specified under sub. 9(5) or for any other similar project, as determined by the manager.SB1178,5,1110(e) Give preference to members of a work crew on a project who are at least 16 11years of age and not more than 30 years of age.SB1178,5,1312(f) Require that at least 50 percent of the members of a work crew come from 13an underserved population in this state, as determined by the manager.SB1178,5,1714(g) Prohibit any employee or contractor from performing services under the 15Wisconsin climate corps program if those services displace the services of any 16individual who is employed by this state in a position, as defined in s. 230.03 (11), or 17who is employed by a local government in a permanent position.SB1178,5,1818(h) Pay each worker on a project at least $15 per hour worked.SB1178,5,2019(i) Provide each worker on a project with a housing stipend of not less than 20$100 per week or provide housing to each worker.SB1178,5,2321(j) Provide each worker on a project with health insurance coverage that is 22equivalent to a gold level health plan purchased on the American health benefit 23exchange, as described in 42 USC 18031, in this state.SB1178,6,21(k) Remain neutral with respect to any labor organizing among workers on a 2project.SB1178,6,63(L) Require each sponsor, upon completion of a project, to erect a permanent 4plaque at each project work site located on land owned by the federal or state 5government, a local government, a tribal government, or a nonprofit entity that 6identifies the site as a Wisconsin climate corps project.SB1178,6,127(m) Submit an annual report to the department, no later than January 31, 8identifying, to the greatest extent practicable, information regarding the location of 9each project, a brief description of each project, and the training provided to 10employees. The manager shall also provide to the department any information the 11department considers necessary to complete the report under sub. (11) and may 12recommend improvements to the program.SB1178,6,1313(5) Scope of projects. Projects may include any of the following:SB1178,6,1514(a) Coordination of flood resilience activities in urban and rural watershed 15areas of this state. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1178 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1178 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1178 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1178 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1178: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting